New York, session 2025-2026, S4569.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 296 of the executive law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph (i) to read as follows: 3 (i) For an appraiser of real property, because of the age, race, 4 creed, color, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity or 5 expression, military status, sex, disability, predisposing genetic char- 6 acteristics, familial status, marital status or status as a victim of 7 domestic violence of any owner, resident or any other individual, to 8 appraise real property at a different value. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 10 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08679-01-5